New York, session 2025-2026, S3753.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to 2 the contrary, the empire state development corporation shall establish 3 an office of accountability and compliance, the sole mission of which is 4 to monitor projects for compliance to terms of general project plans and 5 other related agreements. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08135-01-5